District of Columbia statutes.
31-1131.08a

Changes of name, residency, or address.

(a)

A licensee shall inform the Commissioner of a change of the licensee’s residential or business address within 30 days of the change of address. A nonresident insurance producer who moves from one state to another state or a resident insurance producer who moves from the District to another state shall file a change of address and provide certification from the new resident state within 30 days after the change of residence. No fee or license application shall be required.

(b)

A licensee shall inform the Commissioner of a change of the licensee’s legal or corporate name within 30 days after the change of name.

(c)

Failure to timely inform the Commissioner of a change in legal name or address shall result in a penalty as prescribed by the Commissioner.

(d)

A person licensed as an insurance producer in another state who moves to the District shall make application within 90 days of establishing legal residence to become a resident licensee under § 31-1131.06 unless the person maintains his principal place of business in another state and the person has a resident insurance producer license in that state.

History

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 8a
as added May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-155, § 2(j), 55 DCR 3683